Massachusetts, session 194th, H4739.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection C of section 4 of chapter 8 of the Acts of 1989 is hereby
amended by striking paragraph 14A.
SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1